src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_LUPA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 back p~v
!!€ lupa: lupa+N+Sg+Nom # permit
!!€ lupaa: lupa+N+Sg+Par
!!€ lupana: lupa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ luvassa: lupa+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ lupina: lupa+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ luvissa: lupa+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ lupien: lupa+N+Pl+Gen
0:pa   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:va    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:p   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:v    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:pa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:p   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:p   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:p   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:va   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_LEIPÄ
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 front p~v
!!€ leipä: leipä+N+Sg+Nom # bread
!!€ leipää: leipä+N+Sg+Par
!!€ leipänä: leipä+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ leivässä: leipä+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ leipinä: leipä+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ leivissä: leipä+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ leipien: leipä+N+Pl+Gen
0:pä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pä   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:vä    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:p   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:v    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:pä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:p   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:p   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:p   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:pä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:vä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:pä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_SOTA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 back t~d
!!€ sota: sota+N+Sg+Nom # war
!!€ sotaa: sota+N+Sg+Par
!!€ sotana: sota+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ sodassa: sota+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ sotina: sota+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ sodissa: sota+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ sotien: sota+N+Pl+Gen
0:ta   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:da    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:d    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:t   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:t   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:da   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_PÖYTÄ
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 front t~d
!!€ pöytä: pöytä+N+Sg+Nom # table
!!€ pöytää: pöytä+N+Sg+Par
!!€ pöytänä: pöytä+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ pöydässä: pöytä+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ pöytinä: pöytä+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ pöydissä: pöytä+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ pöytien: pöytä+N+Pl+Gen
0:tä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:dä    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:d    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:dä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_HONKA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 back k~g
!!€ honka: honka+N+Sg+Nom kind of a tree
!!€ honkaa: honka+N+Sg+Par
!!€ honkana: honka+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ hongassa: honka+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ honkina: honka+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ hongissa: honka+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ honkien: honka+N+Pl+Gen
0:ka   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ga    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:k   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:g    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ka   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:k   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:k   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:k   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ga   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KENKÄ
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 frot k~g
!!€ kenkä: kenkä+N+Sg+Nom # shoe
!!€ kenkää: kenkä+N+Sg+Par
!!€ kenkänä: kenkä+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ kengässä: kenkä+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ kengissä: kenkä+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ kenkiin: kenkä+N+Pl+Ill
0:kä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:gä    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:k   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:g    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:k   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:k   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:k   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:gä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;


LEXICON N_KOMPA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 back p~m
!!€ kompa: kompa+N+Sg+Nom trick question
!!€ kompaa: kompa+N+Sg+Par
!!€ kompana: kompa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ kommassa: kompa+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ kompina: kompa+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ kommissa: kompa+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ kompien: kompa+N+Pl+Gen
0:pa   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ma    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:p   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:m    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:pa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:p   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:p   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:p   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ma   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:p   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!! There is a gap for ä-final word with p:m variation

LEXICON N_MULTA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 back t~l
!!€ multa: multa+N+Sg+Nom # dirt
!!€ multaa: multa+N+Sg+Par
!!€ multana: multa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ mullassa: multa+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ multina: multa+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ mullissa: multa+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ multien: multa+N+Pl+Gen
0:ta   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:la    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:l    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:t   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:t   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:la   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_SYLTÄ
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 front t~l
!!€ syltä: syltä+N+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€ syltää: syltä+N+Sg+Par
!!€ syltänä: syltä+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ syllässä: syltä+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ syltinä: syltä+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ syllissä: syltä+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ syltien: syltä+N+Pl+Gen
0:tä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:lä    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:l    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:lä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KUNTA
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 back t~n
!!€ kunta: kunta+N+Sg+Nom # municipality
!!€ kuntaa: kunta+N+Sg+Par
!!€ kuntana: kunta+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ kunnassa: kunta+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ kuntina: kunta+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ kunnissa: kunta+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ kuntien: kunta+N+Pl+Gen
0:ta   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:na    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:n    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:t   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:t   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:na   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_EMÄNTÄ
!!€gt-norm: Noun 10 front t~n
!!€ emäntä: emäntä+N+Sg+Nom # hostess
!!€ emäntää: emäntä+N+Sg+Par
!!€ emäntänä: emäntä+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ emännässä: emäntä+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ emäntinä: emäntä+N+Pl+Ess
!!€ emännissä: emäntä+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ emäntien: emäntä+N+Pl+Gen
0:tä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:nä    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:n    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:nä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!! There is a gap for k:j gradation in a-final stems.

LEXICON  N
aarnihonka+N:aarni#hon N_HONKA  ;
aseenkantolupa+N:aseen#kanto#lu N_LUPA  ;
aurinkokunta+N:aurinko#kun N_KUNTA  ;
edeskäypä+N:edeskäy N_LEIPÄ  ;
elinkeinolupa+N:elin#keino#lu N_LUPA  ;
esikunta+N:esi#kun N_KUNTA  ;
etunäkökohta+N:etu#näkö#koh N_SOTA  ;
haimasyöpä+N:haima#syö N_LEIPÄ  ;
hammasmätä+N:hammas#mä N_PÖYTÄ  ;
heimosota+N:heimo#so N_SOTA  ;
henkikulta+N:henki#kul N_MULTA  ;
hiihtokenkä+N:hiihto#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
hirvenkaatolupa+N:hirven#kaato#lu N_LUPA  ;
honka+N:hon N_HONKA  ;
hupa+N:hu N_LUPA  ;
huuhdonta+N:huuhdon N_KUNTA  ;
huumesota+N:huume#so N_SOTA  ;
häntä+N:hän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
ikihonka+N:iki#hon N_HONKA  ;
informaatiosota+N:informaatio#so N_SOTA  ;
itä+N:i N_PÖYTÄ  ;
johanneksenleipä+N:johanneksenlei N_LEIPÄ  ;
juhlaemäntä+N:juhla#emän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
juhlakenkä+N:juhla#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
järkikulta+N:järki#kul N_MULTA  ;
kaatolupa+N:kaato#lu N_LUPA  ;
kalastuskunta+N:kalastus#kun N_KUNTA  ;
kalkkisälpä+N:kalkki#säl N_LEIPÄ  ;
kanadannäätä+N:kanadannää N_PÖYTÄ  ;
kangaskenkä+N:kangas#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
kantojuhta+N:kanto#juh N_SOTA  ;
katinkulta+N:katin#kul N_MULTA  ;
kattohuopa+N:katto#huo N_LUPA  ;
kauppiaskunta+N:kauppias#kun N_KUNTA  ;
kelohonka+N:kelo#hon N_HONKA  ;
keltamulta+N:kelta#mul N_MULTA  ;
kerrosvoileipä+N:kerros#voilei N_LEIPÄ  ;
kesäkenkä+N:kesä#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
ketunhäntä+N:ketun#hän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
kiinnityskohta+N:kiinnitys#koh N_SOTA  ;
kissanhäntä+N:kissan#hän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
kokojyväleipä+N:koko#jyvä#lei N_LEIPÄ  ;
komennuskunta+N:komennus#kun N_KUNTA  ;
kompa+N:kom N_KOMPA  ;
kompostimulta+N:komposti#mul N_MULTA  ;
korttipelipöytä+N:kortti#pelipöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
kulta+N:kul N_MULTA  ;
kuormajuhta+N:kuorma#juh N_SOTA  ;
kävelykenkä+N:kävely#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
kääntöpöytä+N:kääntö#pöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
lainvalmistelukunta+N:lainvalmistelu#kun N_KUNTA  ;
laivanisäntä+N:laivanisän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
lakitupa+N:laki#tu N_LUPA  ;
lampaankääpä+N:lampaankää N_LEIPÄ  ;
lapinnoita+N:lapinnoi N_SOTA  ;
lapsikulta+N:lapsi#kul N_MULTA  ;
lehtimulta+N:lehti#mul N_MULTA  ;
lonka+N:lon N_HONKA  ;
lumikenkä+N:lumi#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
lupa+N:lu N_LUPA  ;
maastonkohta+N:maaston#koh N_SOTA  ;
maasälpä+N:maa#säl N_LEIPÄ  ;
maatilanemäntä+N:maa#tilan#emän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
mehiläisleipä+N:mehiläis#lei N_LEIPÄ  ;
merihätä+N:meri#hä N_PÖYTÄ  ;
mokkakenkä+N:mokka#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
munkkikunta+N:munkki#kun N_KUNTA  ;
mussiivikulta+N:mussiivikul N_MULTA  ;
myymäläisäntä+N:myymälä#isän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
mäkitupa+N:mäki#tu N_LUPA  ;
naapuripöytä+N:naapuri#pöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
nauhakenkä+N:nauha#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
noita+N:noi N_SOTA  ;
näkinkenkä+N:näkin#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
ohjauspöytä+N:ohjaus#pöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
olkileipä+N:olki#lei N_LEIPÄ  ;
ota+N:o N_SOTA  ;
pallohäntä+N:pallo#hän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
perikunta+N:perikun N_KUNTA  ;
piimäleipä+N:piimä#lei N_LEIPÄ  ;
pikkupunka+N:pikku#pun N_HONKA  ;
pilvenlonka+N:pilven#lon N_HONKA  ;
pirtinpöytä+N:pirtin#pöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
poikkeuslupa+N:poikkeus#lu N_LUPA  ;
poroisäntä+N:poro#isän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
preeriamulta+N:preeria#mul N_MULTA  ;
punahonka+N:puna#hon N_HONKA  ;
punka+N:pun N_HONKA  ;
puutarhamulta+N:puu#tarha#mul N_MULTA  ;
puutarhapöytä+N:puu#tarha#pöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
pylväskenkä+N:pylväs#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
pörröhäntä+N:pörrö#hän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
rajakohta+N:raja#koh N_SOTA  ;
rauhassyöpä+N:rauhas#syö N_LEIPÄ  ;
ruokapöytä+N:ruoka#pöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
saarivaltakunta+N:saari#valta#kun N_KUNTA  ;
saarnalupa+N:saarna#lu N_LUPA  ;
siimahäntä+N:siima#hän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
silkkikenkä+N:silkki#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
snookerpöytä+N:snooker#pöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
sompa+N:som N_KOMPA  ;
sotilastukikohta+N:sotilastukikoh N_SOTA  ;
suolapunka+N:suola#pun N_HONKA  ;
syltä+N:syl N_SYLTÄ  ;
syvyyssuunta+N:syvyys#suun N_KUNTA  ;
sälpä+N:säl N_LEIPÄ  ;
taksilupa+N:taksi#lu N_LUPA  ;
teepöytä+N:tee#pöy N_PÖYTÄ  ;
terveyskenkä+N:terveys#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
tuomiorovastikunta+N:tuomiorovasti#kun N_KUNTA  ;
tuontilupa+N:tuonti#lu N_LUPA  ;
tyynysota+N:tyyny#so N_SOTA  ;
työkenkä+N:työ#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
töpöhäntä+N:töpö#hän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
valkokulta+N:valko#kul N_MULTA  ;
varsimätä+N:varsi#mä N_PÖYTÄ  ;
vartiotupa+N:vartio#tu N_LUPA  ;
varvaskenkä+N:varvas#ken N_KENKÄ  ;
venekunta+N:vene#kun N_KUNTA  ;
verileipä+N:veri#lei N_LEIPÄ  ;
viherkulta+N:viher#kul N_MULTA  ;
vuotokohta+N:vuoto#koh N_SOTA  ;
väli-isäntä+N:väli-isän N_EMÄNTÄ  ;
